Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska49-14,105
Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission; established; members; appointment; procedure.

There is hereby established the Nebraska Accountability and Disclosure Commission. The commission shall be composed of nine members, including the Secretary of State. The eight appointed members shall be appointed, subject to the provisions of section 49-14,110, as follows:

(1) Four members shall be appointed by the Governor in the following manner:

(a) One member from each of two lists submitted by the Legislature. Each list shall contain at least five individuals who are qualified to serve pursuant to section 49-14,106 and subsection (2) of section 49-14,111; and

(b) Two members from the citizenry of the state at large; and

(2) Four members shall be appointed by the Secretary of State in the following manner:

(a) One member from a list of at least five individuals who are qualified to serve pursuant to section 49-14,106 and subsection (2) of section 49-14,111 submitted by the Democrat state chairperson;

(b) One member from a list of at least five individuals who are qualified to serve pursuant to section 49-14,106 and subsection (2) of section 49-14,111 submitted by the Republican state chairperson; and

(c) Two members from the citizenry of the state at large.

Laws 1976, LB 987, § 105;

Laws 1979, LB 54, § 1;

Laws 1990, LB 534, § 2.